District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.44

Issuance of building permit or certificate of occupancy.

Prior to the issuance of a building permit or certificate of occupancy for the commercial development, whichever is applicable, the applicant shall certify to the District that the provisions of this part have been satisfied.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1500